Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.262

Elected officials—Restoration of withdrawn contributions.

Any active member or separated member who was not eligible to restore contributions under section 3, chapter 317, Laws of 1986, solely because he or she was an elected official, other than an elected official under Articles II or III of the Constitution of the state of Washington, shall be permitted to restore withdrawn contributions for periods of nonelected service no later than June 30, 1994, with interest as determined by the director.

[ 1993 c 506 s 2.]